src-fst-morphology-root.lexc.md
German language

* +SP2 	   singular or plural Formal

*  +NoArt	 Stark accompanied preceding Indef
Schwach Def
gemischt Indef

* +Symbol = independent symbols in the text stream, like £, €, ©

Homonyms

Semantic tags to help disambiguation & synt. analysis: (before POS)

*  +Sem/Act          = Activity
*  +Sem/Adr          = Webadr
*  +Sem/Amount       = Amount
*  +Sem/Ani          = Animate
*  +Sem/Aniprod      = Animal Product
*  +Sem/Body         = Bodypart
*  +Sem/Body-abstr   = siellu, vuoig?a, jierbmi
*  +Sem/Build        = Building
*  +Sem/Build-part   = Part of Bulding, like the closet
*  +Sem/Cat              = Category
*  +Sem/Clth         = Clothes
*  +Sem/Clth-jewl    = Jewelery
*  +Sem/Clth-part    = part of clothes, boallu, sávdnji...
*  +Sem/Ctain        = Container
*  +Sem/Ctain-abstr  = Abstract container like bank account
*  +Sem/Ctain-clth   = Soft container, like a rucksack
*  +Sem/Curr         = Currency like dollár, Not Money
*  +Sem/Dance        = Dance
*  +Sem/Dir              = Direction like GPS-kursa
*  +Sem/Domain       = Domain like politics, reindeerherding (a system of actions)
*  +Sem/Drink        = Drink
*  +Sem/Dummytag     = Dummytag
*  +Sem/Edu          = Educational event
*  +Sem/Event        = Event
*  +Sem/Feat                 = Feature, like Árvu
*  +Sem/Feat-phys    = Physiological feature, ivdni, fárda
*  +Sem/Feat-psych   = Psychological feauture
*  +Sem/Feat-measr   = Psychological feauture
*  +Sem/Fem          = Female name
*  +Sem/Food         = Food
*  +Sem/Food-med     = Medicine
*  +Sem/Furn         = Furniture
*  +Sem/Game         = Game
*  +Sem/Geom         = Geometrical object
*  +Sem/Group        = Animal or Human Group
*  +Sem/Hum          = Human
*  +Sem/Hum-abstr    = Human abstract
*  +Sem/Ideol        = Ideology
*  +Sem/Lang         = Language
*  +Sem/Mal          = Male name
*  +Sem/Mat          = Material for producing things
*  +Sem/Measr        = Measure
*  +Sem/Money        = Has to do with money, like wages, not Curr(ency)
*  +Sem/Obj          = Object
*  +Sem/Obj-clo      = Cloth
*  +Sem/Obj-cogn      = Cloth
*  +Sem/Obj-el       = (Electrical) machine or apparatus
*  +Sem/Obj-ling     = Object with something written on it
*  +Sem/Obj-rope     = flexible ropelike object
*  +Sem/Obj-surfc    = Surface object
*  +Sem/Org          = Organisation
*  +Sem/Part                 = Feature, oassi, bealli
*  +Sem/Perc-cogn      = Cloth
*  +Sem/Perc-emo     = Emotional perception
*  +Sem/Perc-phys    = Physical perception
*  +Sem/Perc-psych           = Physical perception
*  +Sem/Plant        = Plant
*  +Sem/Plant-part   = Plant part
*  +Sem/Plc          = Place
*  +Sem/Plc-abstr         = Abstract place
*  +Sem/Plc-elevate       = Place
*  +Sem/Plc-line          = Place
*  +Sem/Plc-water         = Place
*  +Sem/Pos                  = Position (as in social position job)
*  +Sem/Process      = Process
*  +Sem/Prod                 = Product
*  +Sem/Prod-audio   = Audio product
*  +Sem/Prod-cogn    = Cognition product
*  +Sem/Prod-ling    = Linguistic product
*  +Sem/Prod-vis     = Visual product
*  +Sem/Rel                  = Relation
*  +Sem/Route        = Route
*  +Sem/Rule         = Rule or convention
*  +Sem/Semcon       = Semantic concept
*  +Sem/Sign             = Sign (e.g. numbers, punctuation) 
*  +Sem/Sport       = Sport
*  +Sem/State                = 
*  +Sem/State-sick   = Illness
*  +Sem/Substnc      = Substance, like Air and Water
*  +Sem/Sur          = Surname
*  +Sem/Symbol       = Symbol
*  +Sem/Time         = Time
*  +Sem/Tool                 = Prototypical tool for repairing things
*  +Sem/Tool-catch   = Tool used for catching (e.g. fish)
*  +Sem/Tool-clean   = Tool used for cleaning
*  +Sem/Tool-it      = Tool used in IT
*  +Sem/Tool-measr   = Tool used for measuring
*  +Sem/Tool-music   = Music instrument
*  +Sem/Tool-write   = Writing tool
*  +Sem/Txt          = Text (girji, lávlla...)
*  +Sem/Veh          = Vehicle
*  +Sem/Wpn          = Weapon
*  +Sem/Wthr         = The Weather or the state of ground

Multiple Semantic tags:
* +Sem/Act_Group Activity and Group
* +Sem/Act_Plc   A persons job is an activity, and a place as well
* +Sem/Act_Route Activity and Route, ie johtolat
* +Sem/Amount_Build   Amount and Building
* +Sem/Amount_Semcon
* +Sem/Ani_Body-abstr_Hum
* +Sem/Ani_Build
* +Sem/Ani_Build-part
* +Sem/Ani_Build_Hum_Txt
* +Sem/Ani_Group
* +Sem/Ani_Group_Hum
* +Sem/Ani_Hum
* +Sem/Ani_Hum_Plc
* +Sem/Ani_Hum_Time
* +Sem/Ani_Plc
* +Sem/Ani_Plc_Txt
* +Sem/Ani_Time
* +Sem/Ani_Veh
* +Sem/Aniprod_Hum
* +Sem/Aniprod_Obj-clo
* +Sem/Aniprod_Perc-phys
* +Sem/Aniprod_Plc
* +Sem/Ant_Fem Anthtroponym Female
* +Sem/Ant_Mal Anthtroponym Male
* +Sem/Body-abstr_Prod-audio_Semcon
* +Sem/Body_Body-abstr
* +Sem/Body_Clth
* +Sem/Body_Food
* +Sem/Body_Group_Hum
* +Sem/Body_Hum
* +Sem/Body_Mat
* +Sem/Body_Measr
* +Sem/Body_Obj_Tool-catch
* +Sem/Body_Plc
* +Sem/Body_Time
* +Sem/Build-part_Plc
* +Sem/Build_Build-part
* +Sem/Build_Clth-part
* +Sem/Build_Edu_Org
* +Sem/Build_Event_Org
* +Sem/Build_Org
* +Sem/Build_Route
* +Sem/Clth-jewl_Curr
* +Sem/Clth-jewl_Money
* +Sem/Clth-jewl_Plant
* +Sem/Clth_Hum
* +Sem/Ctain-abstr_Org
* +Sem/Ctain-clth_Plant
* +Sem/Ctain-clth_Veh
* +Sem/Ctain_Feat-phys
* +Sem/Ctain_Furn
* +Sem/Ctain_Tool
* +Sem/Ctain_Tool-measr
* +Sem/Curr_Org
* +Sem/Dance_Org
* +Sem/Dance_Prod-audio
* +Sem/Domain_Food-med
* +Sem/Domain_Prod-audio
* +Sem/Edu_Event
* +Sem/Edu_Group_Hum
* +Sem/Edu_Mat
* +Sem/Edu_Org
* +Sem/Event_Food
* +Sem/Event_Hum
* +Sem/Event_Plc
* +Sem/Event_Time
* +Sem/Feat-measr_Plc
* +Sem/Feat-phys_Tool-write
* +Sem/Feat-phys_Veh
* +Sem/Feat-phys_Wthr
* +Sem/Feat-psych_Hum
* +Sem/Feat_Plant
* +Sem/Food_Perc-phys
* +Sem/Food_Plant
* +Sem/Game_Obj-play
* +Sem/Geom_Obj
* +Sem/Group_Hum
* +Sem/Group_Hum_Org
* +Sem/Group_Hum_Plc
* +Sem/Group_Hum_Prod-vis
* +Sem/Group_Org
* +Sem/Group_Sign
* +Sem/Group_Txt
* +Sem/Hum_Lang
* +Sem/Hum_Lang_Plc
* +Sem/Hum_Lang_Time
* +Sem/Hum_Obj
* +Sem/Hum_Org
* +Sem/Hum_Plant
* +Sem/Hum_Plc
* +Sem/Hum_Tool
* +Sem/Hum_Veh
* +Sem/Hum_Wthr
* +Sem/Lang_Tool
* +Sem/Mat_Plant
* +Sem/Mat_Txt
* +Sem/Measr_Time
* +Sem/Money_Obj
* +Sem/Money_Txt
* +Sem/Obj-play
* +Sem/Obj-play_Sport
* +Sem/Obj_Semcon
* +Sem/Clth-jewl_Org
* +Sem/Org_Rule
* +Sem/Org_Txt
* +Sem/Org_Veh
* +Sem/Part_Prod-cogn
* +Sem/Perc-emo_Wthr
* +Sem/Plant_Plant-part
* +Sem/Plant_Tool
* +Sem/Plant_Tool-measr
* +Sem/Plc-abstr_Rel_State
* +Sem/Plc-abstr_Route
* +Sem/Plc_Pos
* +Sem/Plc_Route
* +Sem/Plc_Substnc
* +Sem/Plc_Substnc_Wthr
* +Sem/Plc_Time
* +Sem/Plc_Tool-catch
* +Sem/Plc_Wthr
* +Sem/Prod-audio_Txt
* +Sem/Prod-cogn_Txt
* +Sem/Semcon_Txt
* +Sem/Obj_State
* +Sem/Substnc_Wthr
* +Sem/Time_Wthr

Derivation

Valency tags, i.e. tags assigned to verbs or prepositions for denoting their arguments

* +%<acc%> case tags
* +%<dat%> case tags
* +%<gen%> case tags
* +%<nom%> case tags

TRIGGER
* %^A2E 
* %^A2I 
* %^A2O 
* %^A2Ö 
* %^A2U 
* %^A2Ü 
* %^A2IE 
* %^O2E 
* %^O2I 
* %^O2IE 
* %^EI2IE 
* %^EI2I 
* %^CC2C mm:m0 kommen kommst kamst
* %^DeV g0:ch
* %^LowerVow o:a
* %^Pen penultimate syllable
* %^RmVow remove vowel
* %^Umlaut umlaut a:ä, o:ö, u:ü

## Escaped symbols

Symbols that need to be escaped on the lower side (towards twolc):
* »
* «
* >
* <

The Usage extents are marked using following tags:

*  +Err/Orth      
* ** +Use/Marg        ** marginal (?)
* ** +Use/-Spell      ** Excluded in speller
* ** +Use/SpellNoSugg ** recognized but not suggested in speller

COMPOUNDING
* +Cmp compound
* +Use/Circ FIXME, (where I am)

## Flag diacritics
We have manually optimised the structure of our lexicon using following
flag diacritics to restrict morhpological combinatorics - only allow compounds
with verbs if the verb is further derived into a noun again:
|  @P.NeedNoun.ON@ | (Dis)allow compounds with verbs unless nominalised
|  @D.NeedNoun.ON@ | (Dis)allow compounds with verbs unless nominalised
|  @C.NeedNoun@ | (Dis)allow compounds with verbs unless nominalised

For languages that allow compounding, the following flag diacritics are needed
to control position-based compounding restrictions for nominals. Their use is
handled automatically if combined with +CmpN/xxx tags. If not used, they will
do no harm.
|  @P.CmpFrst.FALSE@ | Require that words tagged as such only appear first
|  @D.CmpPref.TRUE@ | Block such words from entering ENDLEX
|  @P.CmpPref.FALSE@ | Block these words from making further compounds
|  @D.CmpLast.TRUE@ | Block such words from entering R
|  @D.CmpNone.TRUE@ | Combines with the next tag to prohibit compounding
|  @U.CmpNone.FALSE@ | Combines with the prev tag to prohibit compounding
|  @P.CmpOnly.TRUE@ | Sets a flag to indicate that the word has passed R
|  @D.CmpOnly.FALSE@ | Disallow words coming directly from root.

Use the following flag diacritics to control downcasing of derived proper
nouns (e.g. Finnish Pariisi -> pariisilainen). See e.g. North Sámi for how to use
these flags. There exists a ready-made regex that will do the actual down-casing
given the proper use of these flags.
|  @U.Cap.Obl@ | Allowing downcasing of derived names: deatnulasj.
|  @U.Cap.Opt@ | Allowing downcasing of derived names: deatnulasj.

* @U.Cap.Obl@ Nouns ;  This is stated once since R also leads directly to Nouns

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/root.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-deu/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/root.lexc)</small>

---
